Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 37. Uniform Alcoholism and Intoxication Treatment Act.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs and Controlled Substances, § 259 et seq.

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Mentally Impaired Persons, §§ 140-144.

14 C.J.S., Chemical Dependents, § 13 et seq.

Alcoholic as entitled to public assistance under poor laws. 43 ALR3d 554.

Validity, construction and effect of Uniform Alcoholism and Intoxication Treatment Act. 85 ALR3d 701.

Sec. 47.37.010.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state to recognize, appreciate, and reinforce the example set by its citizens who lead, believe in, and support a life of sobriety. It is also the policy of the state that alcoholics and intoxicated persons should not be criminally prosecuted for their consumption of alcoholic beverages and that they should be afforded a continuum of treatment that can introduce them to, and help them learn, new life skills and social skills that would be useful to them in attaining and maintaining normal lives as productive members of society.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning the treatment of alcoholics, see AS

47.30.470

—

47.30.500

.

Sec. 47.37.020.
Division of alcoholism and drug abuse. [Repealed, E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003).]

Sec. 47.37.030.
Powers of department.

The department may

plan, establish, and maintain programs for the prevention and treatment of alcoholism, drug abuse, and misuse of hazardous volatile materials and substances by inhalant abusers;

make contracts and award grants necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including contracts with the grants to public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, to pay them for services rendered or furnished to alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, or inhalant abusers; to the maximum extent possible, contracts and grants must be for a period of two years; contracts under this paragraph are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code);

solicit and accept for use a gift of money or property or a grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, the state or a political subdivision of it, or a private source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies in making an application for a grant;

administer or supervise the administration of the provisions relating to alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers of state plans submitted for federal funding under federal health, welfare, or treatment legislation;

coordinate its activities and cooperate with alcoholism, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse programs in this and other states, and make contracts and other joint or cooperative arrangements with state, local, or private agencies for the treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drugs abusers, and inhalant abusers, and for the common advancement of alcoholism, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse programs in this and other states;

keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics;

do other acts necessary to implement the authority expressly granted to it;

acquire, hold, or dispose of real property or any interest in it, and construct, lease, or otherwise provide treatment facilities for alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers; however, the department shall encourage local initiative, involvement, and financial participation under grants-in-aid whenever possible in preference to the construction or operation of facilities directly by the department; contracting and construction under this paragraph are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code);

strengthen and enhance the process for identifying people who have co-occurring substance abuse and mental health disorders;

establish a secure enhanced detoxification and treatment center for persons involuntarily detained because they are likely to inflict physical harm to self or others; in this paragraph, “enhanced” means the ability to treat co-occurring substance abuse and mental health disorders;

develop and implement a substance abuse treatment system using evidence-based best practices or, if evidence-based best practices do not exist, research-based practices, that includes a procedure for adapting the practices to new situations and for collaboration with consumer-based programs; if research-based practices are not known or available, the department may include consensus-based or, if funds are available, promising practices; a practice must promote independence, recovery, employment, education, ongoing community-based treatment, housing, and other aspects of harm reduction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1978; am § 61 ch 106 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 71, §§ 13 — 17 (1988); am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 76 § 3 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 37 (2003); am § 2 ch 59 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “division” in the introductory language and in two places in paragraph (8).

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added paragraphs (9) — (11).

Sec. 47.37.040.
Duties of department.

The department shall

develop, encourage, and foster statewide, regional, and local plans and programs for the prevention of alcoholism and drug abuse and treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers in cooperation with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, and provide technical assistance and consultation services for these purposes;

coordinate the efforts and enlist the assistance of all public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals interested in prevention of alcoholism, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse, and treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers;

cooperate with the Department of Corrections in establishing and conducting programs to provide treatment for alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers in or on parole from penal institutions;

cooperate with the Department of Education and Early Development, school boards, schools, police departments, courts, and other public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals in establishing programs for the prevention of alcoholism, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse, and treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers, and preparing curriculum materials for use at all levels of school education;

prepare, publish, evaluate, and disseminate educational material dealing with the nature and effects of alcohol and drugs, and the misuse of hazardous volatile substances;

develop and implement, as an integral part of treatment programs, an educational program for use in the treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers that includes the dissemination of information concerning the nature and effects of alcohol, drugs, and hazardous volatile substances;

organize and foster training programs for all persons engaged in treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers, and establish standards for training paraprofessional alcoholism, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse workers;

sponsor and encourage research into the causes and nature of alcoholism, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse, and the treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers, and serve as a clearinghouse for information relating to alcoholism, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse;

specify uniform methods for keeping statistical information by public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, and collect and make available relevant statistical information, including number of persons treated, frequency of admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment;

conduct program planning activities approved by the Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse;

review all state health, welfare, and treatment plans to be submitted for federal funding, and advise the commissioner on provisions to be included relating to alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers;

assist in the development of, and cooperate with, alcohol, drug abuse, and inhalant abuse education and treatment programs for employees of state and local governments and businesses and industries in the state;

use the support and assistance of interested persons in the community, particularly recovered alcoholics, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers, to encourage alcoholics, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers to voluntarily undergo treatment;

cooperate with the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities in establishing and conducting programs designed to deal with the problem of persons operating motor vehicles while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance, and develop and approve alcohol information courses required to be taken by drivers under AS 28.15 or made available to drivers to reduce points assessed for violation of traffic laws;

encourage hospitals and other appropriate health facilities to admit without discrimination alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers and to provide them with adequate and appropriate treatment;

encourage all health insurance programs to include alcoholism and drug abuse as a covered illness;

prepare an annual report covering the activities of the department and notify the legislature that the report is available;

develop and implement a training program on alcoholism and drug abuse for employees of state and municipal governments, and private institutions;

develop curriculum materials on drug and alcohol abuse and the misuse of hazardous volatile substances for use in grades kindergarten through 12, as well as a course of instruction for teachers to be charged with presenting the curriculum;

develop and implement or designate, in cooperation with other state or local agencies, a juvenile alcohol safety action program that provides alcohol and substance abuse screening, referral, and monitoring of persons under 18 years of age who have been referred to it by

a court in connection with a charge or conviction of a violation or misdemeanor related to the use of alcohol or a controlled substance;

the agency responsible for the administration of motor vehicle laws in connection with a license action related to the use of alcohol or a controlled substance; or

department staff after a delinquency adjudication that is related to the use of alcohol or a controlled substance;

develop and implement, or designate, in cooperation with other state or local agencies, an alcohol safety action program that provides alcohol and substance abuse screening, referral, and monitoring services to persons who have been referred by a court in connection with a charge or conviction of a misdemeanor involving the use of alcohol or a controlled substance or under AS

04.16.049

or

04.16.050

or referred by an agency of the state with the responsibility for administering motor vehicle laws in connection with a driver’s license action involving the use of alcohol or a controlled substance;

whenever possible, apply evidence-based, research-based, and consensus-based substance abuse and co-occurring substance abuse and mental health disorders treatment practices and remove barriers that prevent the use of those practices;

collaborate with first responders, hospitals, schools, primary care providers, developmental disability treatment providers, law enforcement, corrections, attorneys, the Alaska Court System, community behavioral treatment providers, Alaska Native organizations, and federally funded programs in implementing programs for co-occurring substance abuse and mental health disorders treatment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 39 § 11 (1977); am §§ 2, 4 ch 117 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 55 § 45 (1984); am E.O. No. 71 § 18 (1988); am § 2 ch 75 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 76 § 4 (1990); am § 44 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 111 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 109 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 93 SLA 1998; am § 18 ch 65 SLA 2001; am §§ 51, 52 ch 60 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 108 § 38 (2003); am § 6 ch 56 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 2007; am § 170 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 26 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 71 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and statement of intent relating to treatment for driving while intoxicated and other alcohol-related offenses, see § 1, ch. 60, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For alcohol safety action program services, see 7 AAC 80, art. 3.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “division” in the introductory language and paragraph (17) and inserted “staff” in subparagraph (20)(C).

The 2006 amendment, effective June 9, 2006, inserted “referred by a court under AS

28.35.028

” in paragraph (21).

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added paragraphs (22) and (23).

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (21), deleted “alcohol and substance abuse screening, referral, and monitoring” preceding “services to persons”, deleted “in connection with a charge or conviction of a misdemeanor involving the use of a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft and alcohol or a controlled substance, referred by a court” preceding “under AS

28.35.028

”, inserted “28.35.030, or

28.35.032

,” preceding “or referred by”.

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (21) inserted “AS

04.16.049

,

04.16.050

,” following “referred by a court under”.

The amendment of paragraph (21) by sec. 71, ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, took effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 79, ch, 1, 4SSLA 2017, as amended by sec. 32, ch. 22, SLA 2018.

The amendment of paragraph (21) by sec. 71, ch. 1, 4SSLA, was conditional.
The condition was repealed by sec. 28, ch. 22, SLA 2018.

Sec. 47.37.045.
Community action against substance abuse grants.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

A school district, municipality, nonprofit organization, local governing body of an established village, or community organization may file an application with the department for a community action against substance abuse grant. The application must include a description of the purpose for which grant funds will be used, goals to be achieved by the program or project, methods of measuring achievement of goals, a proposed budget, and statements of the need for and support of the proposed program or project.

Community action against substance abuse grant funds awarded under this section may be used for

Police-In-School Liaison programs staffed by officers that are certified by the Alaska Police Standards Council;

technical assistance for neighborhood based substance abuse prevention or treatment programs;

coordinators for court ordered community service;

preventative or educational programs for youth that involve the community, parents, youth, and local schools;

programs or projects that the department determines are effective in preventing or treating substance abuse at the community level;

supervised youth recreation programs that focus on preventing or treating substance abuse; or

youth assessment and referral programs that provide substance abuse screening services to and monitor compliance for a minor required to participate in an alcoholism or drug education or rehabilitation treatment program under AS

28.15.183

or before the minor’s driver’s license may be reinstated under AS

28.15.211

.

A proposed program or project that includes matching local funds or in-kind contributions shall have priority over a proposed program or project that does not include matching local funds or in-kind contributions. Grants awarded under this section are subject to the restrictions on use provided under AS

37.05.321

.

In addition to the priority given under (d) of this section, the department shall grant a priority to a proposed program or project under (c)(5) of this section if the proposed program or project provides prompt substance abuse treatment for a pregnant woman by advancing the woman on a waiting list for the program or project and by streamlining paperwork for admission of the woman to the program.

In addition to the priorities given under (d) and (e) of this section, the department shall grant a priority to a proposed program or project under (c)(5) of this section if the proposed program or project

creates alternatives to incarceration for nonviolent offenders;

provides rehabilitation services to prisoners who have substance abuse problems;

measures and demonstrates a high rate of harm reduction for participants;

is based on scientifically sound principles of prevention and treatment;

provides job training or employment opportunities after completion of substance abuse treatment;

provides youth treatment;

focuses on drug and alcohol abuse prevention;

addresses alcohol or substance abuse in targeted populations that have statistically higher incidences of alcohol or substance abuse problems; or

addresses co-occurring substance abuse and mental health disorders.

The department may consider not funding a proposed program or project that has been previously funded under this section unless the applicant provides satisfactory evidence of success of the program or project.

The department may not deny funding for a program under this section solely on the basis that the program relies on faith-based strategies so long as the strategies are effective for preventing or treating substance abuse.

In this section,

“established village” means an unincorporated community that is in

the unorganized borough and that has 25 or more permanent residents; or

an organized borough, has 25 or more permanent residents, and

is on a road system and is located more than 50 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality, or

is not on a road system and is located more than 15 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality;

“local governing body” has the meaning given in AS

04.21.080(b)

;

“nonprofit organization” means an organization that qualifies for exemption from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or (4) (Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 2 ch 81 SLA 1990; am § 68 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997; am § 13 ch 93 SLA 1998; am E.O. No. 108 §§ 39, 40 (2003); am § 4 ch 59 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (e) — (h) were enacted as (f) — (i) and relettered in 2007, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (i) and an internal reference in subsection (f) was conformed.

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 81, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “division” in subsection (b) and in paragraph (c)(5).

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added subsections (f) — (i) [now (e) — (h)].

Sec. 47.37.050.
Interdepartmental coordinating committee.

An interdepartmental coordinating committee is created, composed of the commissioners of health and social services, education and early development, transportation and public facilities, labor and workforce development, and public safety, and the director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board. The committee shall meet at least twice annually at the call of the commissioner of health and social services who is its chairman. The committee shall provide for the coordination and exchange of information on all programs relating to alcoholism or drug abuse and act as a permanent liaison among state departments engaged in activities affecting alcoholics, intoxicated persons, and drug abusers. The committee shall assist the commissioner of health and social services in formulating a comprehensive plan for prevention of alcoholism and drug abuse and for treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, and drug abusers.

In exercising its coordinating functions, the committee shall assure that the appropriate state agencies

provide all necessary medical, social, treatment, and educational services for alcoholics, intoxicated persons, and drug abusers and for the prevention of alcoholism and drug abuse, without unnecessary duplication of services;

cooperate in the use of facilities and in the treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, and drug abusers;

adopt approaches for the prevention of alcoholism and drug abuse and the treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, and drug abusers consistent with the policy of AS

47.37.010

—

47.37.270

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 150 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 71 § 19 (1988); am E.O. No. 76 § 5 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 41 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, in (a) of this section, “and early development” was added after “education”, and “and workforce development” was added after “labor” in accordance with §§ 89 and 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, deleted “the director” in the first and last sentences in subsection (a).

Secs. 47.37.060 — 47.37.110.
Review board on alcoholism; alcoholism program coordinator.

[Repealed, E.O. No. 71 § 23 (1988).]

Sec. 47.37.120.
Program development and implementation.

The department shall carry out the development and implementation of a comprehensive program dealing with the prevention and treatment of, and research on, problems of alcoholism and drug abuse as they affect the state.

The comprehensive program carried out under this section must include a strategy for expanding substance abuse treatment services and reducing waiting lists for eligible participants in a substance abuse prevention or treatment program and must include one or more of the factors listed under AS

47.37.045(f)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 71 § 20 (1988); am E.O. No. 76 § 6 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 42 (2003); am § 5 ch 59 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.37.069. Renumbered in 1972. In 2007, in subsection (b), “AS

47.37.045(f)

” was substituted for “AS

47.37.045(g)

” to reflect the 2007 relettering of AS

47.37.045(g)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director.”

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added subsection (b).

Sec. 47.37.125.
Payment for services.

Subject to appropriation by the legislature, money in the mental health trust settlement income account established in AS

37.14.036

may be used to support a service provided under the authority given in this chapter.

History.

(§ 45 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Sec. 47.37.130.
Comprehensive program for treatment; regional facilities.

The department shall establish a comprehensive and coordinated program for the treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers. The department may divide the state into appropriate regions to conduct the program and establish standards for the development of the program on the regional level. In establishing the regions, consideration shall be given to the city and borough lines and population concentrations and, when feasible, programs must be established with maximum local community involvement.

The program of the department must include

emergency treatment provided by a facility affiliated with or part of the medical service of a general hospital;

inpatient treatment;

intermediate treatment;

outpatient and follow-up treatment;

standards for alcohol safety action programs; the standards may vary in their requirements and stringency according to the population, price level, remoteness, access to transportation, and availability of ancillary services of the area to be served; a program must meet the applicable standards before it is approved by the department as an alcohol safety action program; the standards required under this paragraph shall be established in a manner that provides protection of the health, safety, and well-being of clients of the affected programs and protection for the affected programs from exposure to malpractice and liability actions;

the priorities created under AS

47.37.045(e)

and (f); and

standards that are consistent with scientifically sound principles for measuring outcomes.

The department shall ensure that adequate and appropriate treatment is provided to alcoholics and intoxicated persons admitted under AS

47.37.160

—

47.37.190

within the limits of available state and federal funds.

The department shall maintain, supervise, and control all facilities operated by it subject to the regulations of the department.

If possible, the department shall coordinate the activities of the program with all appropriate public and private resources.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

The department may contract for the use of any facility as an approved public treatment facility if the department, subject to the regulations of the department, considers this an effective and economical course to follow. Contracting under this subsection is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

The department shall

inspect, on a regular basis, approved public and private alcohol safety action programs at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner;

maintain a list of approved public and private alcohol safety action programs; and

develop regulations for the operation and management of alcohol safety action programs that ensure

screenings are conducted using a validated risk tool; and

monitoring of participants is appropriate to the risk of reoffense of the participant as determined by the screening.

An approved public and private alcohol safety action program shall file with the department on request data, statistics, schedules, and information that the department reasonably requires. An approved program that fails without good cause to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent returns of them, shall be removed from the list of approved programs.

The department, after holding a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) under the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or refuse to grant an approval for an alcohol safety action program for failure to meet standards established under (b) of this section.

The public and private alcohol safety action programs established under AS

47.37.040

(21) shall provide

screening of eligible persons to determine the risk of the person to reoffend and the criminal risk factors that are contributing to the risk; and

monitoring of participants based on the risk to reoffend as determined by the screening.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 150 SLA 1980; am § 62 ch 106 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 71 § 21 (1988); am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 76 § 7 (1990); am §§ 33, 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am §§ 53, 54 ch 60 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 108 §§ 43 — 51 (2003); am § 6 ch 59 SLA 2007; am E.O. No. 116, § 12 (2012); am §§
171, 172 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.37.070. Renumbered in 1972. In 2007, in (b)(6) of this section, “AS

47.37.045(e)

and (f)” was substituted for “AS

47.37.045(f)

and (g)” to reflect the 2007 relettering of AS

47.37.045(f)

and (g).

Cross references. —

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted references to the department for references to the division and to the director throughout.

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added paragraphs (b)(6) and (b)(7).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (j), inserted “conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” following “The department, after holding a hearing”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (h)(3); added (k); made a related change.

Sec. 47.37.140.
Treatment facilities.

The department shall establish standards for facilities, which standards may vary in their requirements and stringency according to the population, price level, remoteness, access to transportation, and availability of ancillary services of the area to be served, and shall fix the fees to be charged for the required inspections of those facilities. A facility shall meet the applicable standards before it is approved as a public or private treatment facility. The standards shall be enacted in a manner that will provide protection of the health, safety, and well-being of clients of the affected programs and protection for the affected programs from exposure to malpractice and liability actions.

The department shall inspect, on a regular basis, approved public and private treatment facilities at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.

The department shall maintain a list of approved public and private treatment facilities.

An approved public and private treatment facility shall file with the department, on request, data, statistics, schedules, and information which the department reasonably requires. An approved public or private treatment facility that without good cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent returns of them, shall be removed from the list of approved treatment facilities.

The department, after holding a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62), may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or refuse to grant an approval for a treatment facility, for failure to meet its standards.

Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the district court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing the officer or employee to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and accounts of, an approved public or private treatment facility refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the department or which the department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of this chapter.

The standards established for facilities under this section must be based on scientifically sound evidence and be consistent with the priorities created under AS

47.37.045(e)

and (f).

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 76 § 8 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 52 (2003); am § 7 ch 59 SLA 2007; am E.O. No. 116, § 13 (2012))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.37.080. Renumbered in 1972. In 2007, in (g) of this section, “AS

47.37.045(e)

and (f)” was substituted for “AS

47.37.045(f)

and (g)” to reflect the 2007 relettering of AS

47.37.045(f)

and (g).

Cross references. —

For the legislative intent of the 1978 amendment concerning facility standards, see § 1, ch. 105, SLA 1978 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for facilities and programs, see 7 AAC 29, art. 1.

For methadone programs, see 7 AAC 33.

For specializations, see 7 AAC 50, art. 7.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director” and for “division” throughout.

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added subsection (g).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (e), inserted “conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” following “The department, after holding a hearing”.

Sec. 47.37.150.
Admission for treatment.

The department shall adopt regulations for the admission of persons into the treatment program, considering available treatment resources and facilities, for the purpose of early and effective treatment of alcoholics, intoxicated persons, drug abusers, and inhalant abusers. In adopting the regulations the department shall be guided by the following standards:

if possible a patient must be treated on a voluntary rather than an involuntary basis;

a patient must be initially assigned or transferred to outpatient or intermediate treatment, unless the patient is found to require inpatient treatment;

a person may not be denied treatment solely because the person has withdrawn from treatment against medical advice on a prior occasion or because the person has relapsed after earlier treatment;

an individualized treatment plan must be prepared and maintained on a current basis for each patient;

provision must be made for a continuum of coordinated treatment services, so that a person who leaves a facility or a form of treatment will use other appropriate treatment and facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 71 § 22 (1988); am § 4 ch 75 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 76 § 9 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 53 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.37.090. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director” in two places in the introductory language.

Sec. 47.37.160.
Voluntary treatment of alcoholics.

An alcoholic may voluntarily apply for treatment directly to an approved public treatment facility.

Subject to regulations adopted by the department, the administrator in charge of an approved public treatment facility may determine who shall be admitted for treatment. If a person is refused admission to an approved public treatment facility, the administrator shall, if possible, refer the person to another approved public treatment facility.

When a patient receiving inpatient care leaves an approved public treatment facility, the patient shall be encouraged to consent to appropriate outpatient or intermediate treatment. If it appears to the administrator in charge of the treatment facility that the patient is an alcoholic who requires help, the administrator shall arrange for assistance in obtaining supportive services and residential facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 150 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 76 § 10 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 54 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.37.100. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director” in subsection (b).